Utah statutes.
63G-6-204 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Duties of chief procurement officer.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the chief procurement officer serves as the central procurement officer of the state and shall:

(1)  adopt office policies governing the internal functions of the Division of Purchasing and General Services;

(2)  procure or supervise the procurement of all supplies, services, and construction needed by the state;

(3)  exercise general supervision and control over all inventories or supplies belonging to the state;

(4)  establish and maintain programs for the inspection, testing, and acceptance of supplies, services, and construction;

(5)  prepare statistical data concerning the procurement and usage of all supplies, services, and construction;

(6)  before June 1, 1990, notify all public procurement units of the requirements of Section 63G-6-406 regarding purchases of recycled paper and recycled paper products, recycling requirements, and provide guidelines on the availability of recycled paper and paper products, including the sources of supply and the potential uses of various grades of recycled paper;

(7)  before July 1, 1992:

(a)  establish standards and specifications for determining which supplies are considered recycled, based upon the chief procurement officer's review of current definitions and standards employed by national procurement, product recycling, and other relevant organizations and the federal Environmental Protection Agency;

(b)  compile and update as necessary the specifications, a list of recycled supplies available on state contract, and sources where the supplies may be obtained;

(c)  make the compiled information under Subsection (7)(b) available to:

(i)  all local government entities under Section 11-37-101;

(ii)  all local health departments under Section 26A-1-108.7;

(iii)  all procurement officers or other persons responsible for purchasing supplies within the public school system under Title 53A, State System of Public Education;

(iv)  all procurement officers or other persons responsible for purchasing supplies within the state system of higher education under Title 53B, State System of Higher Education; and

(v)  all procurement officers or other persons responsible for purchasing supplies for all public procurement units as defined in Section 63G-6-103; and

(d)  present a written report to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee annually prior to November 30 regarding the purchases of recycled goods on state contracts during the prior fiscal year; and

(8)  ensure that:

(a)  before approving a purchase, lease, or rental not covered by an existing statewide contract for information technology or telecommunications supplies or services, the chief information officer and the agency have provided in writing to the division, that the needs analysis required in Section 63F-1-205 was completed, unless the purchase, lease, or rental is approved in accordance with Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program; and

(b)  the oversight authority required by Subsection (8)(a) is not delegated outside the Division of Purchasing and General Services.

